Maryland, session 2025, HB0681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
10–119.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “License” has the meaning stated in § 11–128 of the Transportation
Article.
(3) “Motor Vehicle Administration” means the Motor Vehicle
Administration of the Department of Transportation.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, the
Administration may notify the Motor Vehicle Administration of an obligor with a
noncommercial [license who is 60 days or more out of compliance,] or [an obligor with a]
– 1 –

Ch. 578 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
commercial license who is 120 days or more out of compliance, with the most recent order
of the court in making child support payments if:
(i) the Administration has accepted an assignment of support under
§ 5–312(b)(2) of the Human Services Article; or
(ii) the recipient of support payments has filed an application for
support enforcement services with the Administration.
(2) Upon notification by the Administration under this subsection, the
Motor Vehicle Administration:
(i) shall suspend the obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the
State; and
(ii) may issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege
to drive in the State in accordance with § 16–203 of the Transportation Article.
(c) (1) Before supplying any information to the Motor Vehicle Administration
under this section, the Administration shall:
(i) send written notice of the proposed action to the obligor,
including notice of the obligor’s right to request an investigation on any of the following
grounds:
1. the information regarding the reported arrearage is
inaccurate;
2. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would be an impediment to the obligor’s current or potential employment; or
3. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would place an undue hardship on the obligor because of the obligor’s:
A. documented disability resulting in a verified inability to
work; or
B. inability to comply with the court order; and
(ii) give the obligor a reasonable opportunity to request an
investigation of the proposed action of the Administration.
(2) (i) Upon receipt of a request for investigation from the obligor, the
Administration shall conduct an investigation to determine if any of the grounds under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection exist.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 578
(ii) The Administration shall:
1. send a copy of the obligor’s request for an investigation to
the obligee by first–class mail;
2. give the obligee a reasonable opportunity to respond; and
3. consider the obligee’s response.
(iii) Upon completion of the investigation, the Administration shall
notify the obligor of the results of the investigation and the obligor’s right to appeal to the
Office of Administrative Hearings.
(3) (i) An appeal under this section shall be conducted in accordance
with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(ii) An appeal shall be made in writing and shall be received by the
Office of Administrative Hearings within 20 days after the notice to the obligor of the
results of the investigation.
(4) If, after the investigation or appeal to the Office of Administrative
Hearings, the Administration finds that one of the grounds under paragraph (1)(i) of this
subsection exists, the Administration may not send any information about the obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(5) The Administration may not send any information about an obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration if:
(i) the Administration reaches an agreement with the obligor
regarding a scheduled payment of the obligor’s child support arrearage or a court issues an
order for a scheduled payment of the child support arrearage; and
(ii) the obligor is complying with the agreement or court order.
(d) (1) If, after information about an obligor is supplied to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, the obligor’s arrearage is paid in full, the obligor has demonstrated good
faith by paying the ordered amount of support for 6 consecutive months, the obligor is a
participant in full compliance in an employment program approved by the Administration,
or the Administration finds that one of the grounds under subsection (c)(1)(i) of this section
exists, the Administration shall notify the Motor Vehicle Administration to reinstate the
obligor’s license or privilege to drive.
(2) The Administration may request that the Motor Vehicle
Administration expunge a record of a suspension of a license or privilege to drive for failure
to pay child support:
– 3 –

Ch. 578 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) for an obligor who is enrolled in and compliant with an
employment program approved by the Administration; or
(ii) if the information reported by the Administration that led to the
suspension was inaccurate.
(e) The Secretary of Human Services, in cooperation with the Secretary of
Transportation and the Office of Administrative Hearings, shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(F) (1) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN OBLIGOR WHOSE
INDIVIDUAL INCOME FOR THE CURRENT YEAR IS NOT GREATER THAN 250% OF THE
FEDERAL POVERTY GUIDELINES UNLESS THE OBLIGOR WAS JUDICIALLY
DETERMINED AT THE TIME THE MOST RECENT CHILD SUPPORT ORDER WAS
ENTERED TO BE VOLUNTARILY IMPOVERISHED UNDER § 12–204 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) TO DETERMINE THE INCOME OF AN OBLIGOR UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY CONSIDER:
(I) THE INCOME OF THE OBLIGOR AT THE TIME THE MOST
RECENT CHILD SUPPORT ORDER WAS ENTERED; OR
(II) INFORMATION ON THE OBLIGOR’S INCOME PROVIDED BY
THE OBLIGOR OR AN EMPLOYER OF THE OBLIGOR.
12–202.
(a) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, in any proceeding to establish or modify child support,
whether pendente lite or permanent, the court shall use the child support guidelines set
forth in this subtitle.
(2) (i) There is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of child
support which would result from the application of the child support guidelines set forth in
this subtitle is the correct amount of child support to be awarded.
(ii) The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that the
application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case.
(iii) In determining whether the application of the guidelines would
be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court may consider:
1. the terms of any existing separation or property
settlement agreement or court order, including any provisions for payment of mortgages or
marital debts, payment of college education expenses, the terms of any use and possession
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 578
order or right to occupy the family home under an agreement, any direct payments made
for the benefit of the children required by agreement or order, or any other financial
considerations set out in an existing separation or property settlement agreement or court
order;
2. the presence in the household of either parent of other
children to whom that parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent
is directly contributing; and
3. whether an obligor’s monthly child support obligation
would leave the obligor with a monthly actual income below 110% of the 2019 federal
poverty level for an individual.
(iv) The presumption may not be rebutted solely on the basis of
evidence of the presence in the household of either parent of other children to whom that
parent owes a duty of support and the expenses for whom that parent is directly
contributing.
(v) 1. If the court determines that the application of the
guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case, the court shall make a
written finding or specific finding on the record stating the reasons for departing from the
guidelines.
2. The court’s finding shall state:
A. the amount of child support that would have been required
under the guidelines;
B. how the order varies from the guidelines;
C. how the finding serves the best interests of the child; and
D. in cases in which items of value are conveyed instead of a
portion of the support presumed under the guidelines, the estimated value of the items
conveyed.
(B) AFTER ESTABLISHING A CHILD SUPPORT ORDER, THE COURT SHALL
SEND A COPY OF THE GUIDELINE CALCULATION AND THE ORDER TO THE CHILD
SUPPORT ADMINISTRATION.
[(b)] (C) (1) The court may decline to establish a child support order if the
parent who would have the obligation to pay child support:
(i) lives with the child who would be the subject of the child support
order and is contributing to the support of the child; or
– 5 –

Ch. 578 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) 1. is unemployed;
2. has no financial resources from which to pay child support;
and
3. A. is incarcerated and is expected to remain
incarcerated for the remainder of the time that the parent would have a legal duty to
support the child;
B. is institutionalized in a psychiatric care facility and is
expected to remain institutionalized for the remainder of the time that the parent would
have a legal duty to support the child;
C. is totally and permanently disabled, is unable to obtain or
maintain employment, and has no income other than Supplemental Security Income or
Social Security disability insurance benefits; or
D. is unable to obtain or maintain employment in the
foreseeable future due to compliance with criminal detainment, hospitalization, or a
rehabilitation treatment plan.
(2) The fact that a parent meets or ceases to meet the criteria described in
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall constitute a material change of circumstance for the
purpose of a modification of a child support award.
[(c)] (D) The adoption or revision of the guidelines set forth in this subtitle is not
a material change of circumstance for the purpose of a modification of a child support
award.
[(d)] (E) On or before January 1, 1993, and at least every 4 years after that date,
the Child Support Administration of the Department of Human Services shall:
(1) review the guidelines set forth in this subtitle to ensure that the
application of the guidelines results in the determination of appropriate child support
award amounts; and
(2) report its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
Article – Transportation
16–203.
(b) On notification by the Child Support Administration in accordance with §
10–119 of the Family Law Article that an obligor is [60] 120 days or more out of compliance
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 578
with the most recent order of the court in making child support payments, the
Administration:
(1) Shall suspend an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the State; and
(2) May issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to
drive.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 7 –